Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-1107
Modification of guaranteed asset
protection waiver; limitations.

The creditor or the creditor's designee shall not offer
a guaranteed asset protection waiver when the guaranteed asset protection
waiver contains terms that allow the creditor or the creditor's designee to
modify, unilaterally, the guaranteed asset protection waiver, unless (1) the
modification is favorable to the borrower and is made without any additional
charge to the borrower or (2) the borrower is notified of the proposed modification
and has the option to cancel the guaranteed asset protection waiver without
penalty.

Laws 2010, LB571, § 7.